New York, session 2025-2026, A469.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 2 of section 504 of 2 the education law, as amended by chapter 873 of the laws of 1984, is 3 amended and a new paragraph g is added to read as follows: 4 The retirement board shall consist of [ten] eleven members as follows. 5 g. One member, who currently works as a duly appointed school business 6 official, who is elected by the board of regents of the university of 7 the state of New York to serve for a term of three years, from a list of 8 five or more persons having broad experience and ability in the field of 9 school finance to be presented to the regents by the board of directors 10 of the association of school business officials of New York. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02029-01-5